Washington statutes.
RCW 35.07.060

Ballots.

The ballots for the election shall be printed at the expense of the municipality and there shall be printed thereon the words "for dissolution" in one line and the words "against dissolution" in another line and in other and separate lines, the names of each of the lawfully nominated candidates for receiver. In all other respects the ballots shall be in conformity with the law regulating elections in such cities and towns.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.07.060. Prior: 1897 c 69 s 4; RRS s 8917.]